Utah statutes.
79-2-304.   Natural Resources Conservation Easement Account.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the Natural Resources Conservation Easement Account.
(2)  The Natural Resources Conservation Easement Account consists of:
(a)  grants from private foundations;
(b)  grants from local governments, the state, or the federal government;
(c)  grants from the Quality Growth Commission created under Section
11-38-201;
(d)  donations from landowners for monitoring and enforcing compliance with
conservation easements;
(e)  donations from any other person; and
(f)  interest on account monies.
(3)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall use monies
from the account to monitor and enforce compliance with conservation easements
held by the department.
(4)  The department may not receive or expend donations from the account to
acquire conservation easements.
